Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. In General

§ 15-6-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Conventional gutters” means curb and gutter or combined sidewalk, curb and gutter;

“Drains” or “drainage” means all surface sewers, drains, cross street valley gutters and all kinds of draining other than sanitary sewers or conventional gutters;

“Engineer” means the city engineer, town engineer or any engineer employed by a city or town for local improvement work;

“Improvement” means any lawful local improvement of any kind, which the governing body finds to be of special benefit to the property proposed to be assessed for the cost thereof;

“Streets” means streets, highways, alleys, roads and public ways.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 330; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-330; Laws 1967, ch. 105, § 1; 1971, ch. 36, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Validity of assessment roll prepared by engineer employed bycity. —

Whether or not under this section, construed liberally as provided by § 15-6-105(b), any engineer employed by the city may prepare assessment roll, an assessment confirmed by the council is not void because city engineer did not prepare the roll as provided in §

15-6-402

in view of §

15-6-441

, providing that it shall be no objection to the validity of an assessment that it was made by an unauthorized officer or person if confirmed by the city authorities. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

“Improvement” as defined by section

would include modification of sidewalk basements required as incident to the construction of sidewalks within an improvement district. Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).

Proposed modification to basements underlying sidewalks does not constitute taking

of private property without just compensation where title to the lands underlying streets and sidewalks is in the city. Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).

Composition of improvement district. —

Under this section and §§

15-6-202

,

15-6-206

, and

15-6-302

an improvement district may be composed of two or more parallel streets. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Quoted

in

Mealey v. City of Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970).

Cited

in

Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 15-6-102.
General grant of authority; nonapplicability of other provisions; restriction; nonexclusivity.

Any city or town may provide for the making and maintenance of local improvements and levy and collect special assessments on the property specially benefited to pay all or part of the cost of the improvement. This chapter, without reference to other statutes, unless otherwise expressly provided, constitutes the full authority for the exercise of powers herein granted. No other law relating to any city or town, with regard to like matters, that provides for a petition or an election, requires an approval, or in any way impedes or restricts the doing of things authorized to be done by this chapter, shall be construed as applying to any proceedings or acts done pursuant to this chapter. No one other than the governing body of the municipality may fix, prescribe, modify, supervise or regulate the levy or collection of special assessments or taxes authorized by this chapter, except as expressly provided or necessarily implied, nor supervise or regulate the establishment or modification of grades and the acquisition of any improvement authorized.

It is intended that this chapter provide a separate but not exclusive method of accomplishing its objectives, and it shall not be construed as repealing, amending or changing any other law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 331; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-331; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Municipal corporations have no inherent power to levy assessments for local improvements,

and may exercise such power only when delegated to them by the legislature, in which the power of taxation is exclusively vested only in the manner provided by this article. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Jurisdiction over property. —

If property assessed for local improvements is within the territory of the municipality and is not exempt by law, the municipality has jurisdiction of the subject matter. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Power in regard to sanitary sewers. —

The power to make “local improvements” includes the power to construct and repair sanitary sewers. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Municipality not an insurer of safe condition of sewers. —

Sewer maintenance is a proprietary function for which there is liability, but a municipality is not an insurer of the safe condition of its sewers, being liable in damages only for the failure to exercise ordinary and reasonable care to keep them in repair and free from obstruction, and in general, a similar rule is applicable in instances of damages claimed because of nuisance. Lore v. Douglas, 355 P.2d 367,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1960).

And burden of proof in damage action is upon plaintiff. —

Whatever the basis for damages against a municipality because of injury arising from sewer maintenance, the burden of proof as to lack of reasonable care is upon the plaintiff. Lore v. Douglas, 355 P.2d 367,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1960).

Arterial street improvements are not general as a matter of law.

Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Street paving, done under these provisions, was held to be “public works,”

within the constitution and statute concerning hours of labor. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Time limitation for reassessment. —

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, both written demand and filing of suit having been well within the time limited by statute, general rule is that such action preserves the right until final judgment. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940).

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, where a railroad had contested inclusion of its right-of-way and controversy between railroad and the city was not terminated until the agreed settlement was perfected by dismissal of its appeal, at which time it became determinable what deficiency was, action thereafter was well within the ten years limit of the statute within which reassessment must be made. Cowan v. State ex rel. Blanchar, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1940) (decided under former R.S. 1931, § 22-1545). See §

15-6-430

.

Cited

in

In re Improvement Under Special Assmt. Statutes by San. Sewer., 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1941).

§ 15-6-103.
General powers and duties.

The governing body of any city or town, when considered expedient, may order any improvement or improvements, and determine its character, kind and extent. If the improvement is to be paving, it shall designate the kinds of pavement to be used. It shall provide for the maintenance of an improvement for a specified period not to exceed five (5) years and include the cost of that maintenance in the assessment for making the improvements. It shall levy and collect an assessment upon all lots, parts of lots and parcels of land specially benefited by the improvement to defray all or any part of the cost and expense and determine what lots, parts of lots and parcels of land are specially benefited by the improvements and the amount each is benefited.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 332; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-332; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to costs of construction of state highways through cities and towns, see §

24-2-111

.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Relation to other provision. —

This section and §

15-6-404

are not inconsistent, nor can the former section be said to control the latter. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952).

Cities and towns have been granted plenary power as to local improvements.

Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Determination of extent of improvement rests in discretionof city council. —

The determination of the extent of the improvement and what shall be included in it is the exercise of a legislative power and rests in the legislative discretion of the city council and it follows that no impropriety results in leaving details to the city council, and unless it exceeds such power or exercises its discretion in a fraudulent, arbitrary or capricious manner, the courts will not interfere. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

The determination is vested in the city council and unless the exercise of its legislative discretion is fraudulent, arbitrary or capricious, the courts will not interfere. Mealey v. Laramie, 485 P.2d 1019,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. 1971).

Cities, in exercising legislative powers, may fix the boundaries and the nature and extent of the improvements to be made, and a court will interfere only if the city council exceeds those powers or exercises its discretion in a fraudulent, arbitrary or capricious manner. Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).

And its determination that property benefited very nearly conclusive.—

When the legislature, or its duly delegated agent for that purpose, determines that property is benefited and shall be assessed, such determination is well-nigh conclusive. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952); Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Where no evidence of fraud. —

Determination by city council that railroad's right-of-way was benefited by street improvement and was subject to assessment, was conclusive on the supreme court where there was no evidence that determination by city council was due to fraud, arbitrariness or palpable injustice. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Riverton, 70 Wyo. 119, 247 P.2d 660 (Wyo. 1952).

Assessment void where real estate incorrectly described onassessment roll. —

An assessment against a railway company was held totally void where the assessment roll did not correctly describe the real estate owned by the railroad within the assessment district. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952).

Remedy of owner of bonds payable only from improvement fund upon nonpayment

is to enforce a special assessment by mandamus to compel city officials to reassess. Blanchar v. Casper, 81 F.2d 452, 1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3462 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-104.
Powers incidental to streets.

The governing body of any city or town may:

Design, establish, vacate, widen, extend and open streets or parts thereof;

Appropriate private property for the purpose;

Establish or alter the grade of any street, within the corporate limits; and

Determine and provide everything necessary and convenient to the exercise of this authority.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 333; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-333; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Due process not involved where vacation does not take substantialright. —

Plaintiffs, who were not deprived of any substantial right by reason of the vacation of a portion of an alley, were not in a position to contend that their property was taken without due process of law. Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1951).

Authority to vacate alley sustained. —

Contention by plaintiff that the city was without power or authority to vacate an alley for the sole benefit of a named property owner could not be sustained where the resolution for vacating a portion of the alley did not show it was solely for the benefit of the named property owner but on the contrary showed that it was for the benefit of the city. Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1951).

Vacating alley held not abuse of city council's power. —

A city council did not abuse its power in vacating the west portion of an east-west alley which terminated at its west end at the city limits insofar as a company was concerned whose property was located outside the city limits at the termination end of the alley, and insofar as a lot owner was concerned whose property was located at the east end of the alley, even though the company and lot owner used the alley for transportation of merchandise to and from a warehouse located on property of the lot owner. Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1951).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability for injury to roller skater allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defects, 58 ALR4th 1197.

§ 15-6-105.
Finality of actions; construction of provisions.

The action and decision of the governing body on any matters passed upon by it in relation to any subject covered in this chapter is final and conclusive in the absence of fraud.

This chapter shall be liberally construed for the purpose of carrying out the objects for which it is intended.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 334, 335; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-334, 15.1-335; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-105

, 15-6-106; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Determination by city council conclusive where no evidenceof fraud. —

Determination by city council that railroad's right-of-way was benefited by street improvement and was subject to assessment, was conclusive in the supreme court where there was no evidence that determination by city council was due to fraud, arbitrariness or palpable injustice. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Riverton, 70 Wyo. 119, 247 P.2d 660 (Wyo. 1952).